Maine, session 132, LD280.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §4408 is enacted to read:
§4408. Lifetime ferry passes for retired ferry service employees
A former state employee who is receiving retirement benefits after at least 15 years of
employment with the Maine State Ferry Service and who is a year-round resident of one of
the served islands of the Maine State Ferry Service is eligible to receive a lifetime ferry
pass and a waiver from any reservation fees if the lifetime ferry pass is presented when
making the reservation. For the purposes of this section, "lifetime ferry pass" means a
nontransferable pass that provides on a ferry operated by the Maine State Ferry Service:
1. Walk-on passage. Unlimited walk-on passage for a passenger to and from the
island on which the retiree resides; and
2. Passenger and vehicle passage. One round-trip passage per month for a passenger
and that passenger's vehicle during peak season as determined by rules adopted by the
Department of Transportation and 2 round-trip passages per month during off-peak season
as determined by rules adopted by the department. A reservation for passage described in
this subsection must follow rules adopted by the department. For the purposes of this
subsection, "vehicle" means a noncommercial motor vehicle with 4 tires or fewer and an
overall length of 20 feet or less.
Page 1 - 132LR0404(03)